Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 22.3. Semiconductor Manufacturing Performance Grant Programs.

§§ 59.1-284.13 through 59.1-284.15.1.

Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 761, cl. 3, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s note.

Former § 59.1-284.13, pertaining to the Semiconductor Manufacturing Performance Grant Program; eligible counties, derived from Acts 1996, cc. 642, 652; 2007, c. 813. Former § 59.1-284.14, pertaining to Semiconductor Memory or Logic Wafer Manufacturing
Performance Grant Program; eligible cities, derived from Acts 1996, cc. 645, 651; 2001, c. 863; 2007, c. 813. Former § 59.1-284.14:1, pertaining to grants for capital investments made and jobs created by qualified semiconductor manufacturers,
derived from Acts 2001, c. 863; 2005, c. 392. Former § 59.1-284.15, pertaining to Semiconductor Memory or Logic Wafer Manufacturing Performance Grant Program II, derived from Acts 1997, c. 789; 2001, c. 863; 2007, c. 813. Former §
59.1-284.15:1, pertaining to grants for additional employment and new capital investment, derived from Acts 2001, c. 863; 2005, c. 392.